South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S810.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-4140 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) On the noninterstate highways of this State, a farm truck is limited to a maximum weight limit of ninety thousand pounds with a ten percent enforcement tolerance. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX---